src/morphology/stemparts/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_LEVÄTÄ

0:vät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:vät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:pää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:päs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:päs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:vän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:vät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_JAHDATA

0:dat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:dat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:dan   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:da   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TÄHDÄTÄ

0:dät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:dät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:tä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:dän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:dä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:dät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VONGATA

0:gat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:gat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kaa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kaa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ka   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ka    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:gat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gan   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ga   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:gat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:gat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kaa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VÄNGÄTÄ

0:gät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:gät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:gät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:gät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:gät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TEMMATA

0:mat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:mat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:paa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pa    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:mat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:man   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ma   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:mat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:paa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MULLATA

0:lat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:lat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:lat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:lan   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:la   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:lat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SUUNNATA

0:nat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:nat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:nan   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:na   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_RYNNÄTÄ

0:nät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:nät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:tä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:nän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:nä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VERRATA

0:rat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:rat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ta    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ran   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ra   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HYLJÄTÄ

0:jät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:jät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kä    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:jän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:jä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_DIGATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gaa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:gaa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ga   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:gas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:gas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ga    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kaa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LOBATA

0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:baa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:baa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ba   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:bas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:bas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ba    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:baa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KARHUTA

0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:s   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:a   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0     V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:a     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TÄHYTÄ

0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:s   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KAIKOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:koa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:koa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:koa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:koa   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ko   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:koa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_POIKETA

0:et    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:et    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ke   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kea   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KERETÄ

0:et    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:et    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KOUKUTA

0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:kua   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:kua   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PULPUTA

0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_UPOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LOTOTA

0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LUUTUTA

0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:tua   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tua   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KIVUTA

0:vut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:vun   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KORVETA

0:vet    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vet    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:pea   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:pe    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ven   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pea   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_REVETÄ

0:vet    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:vet    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:peä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:pes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:pe    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ven   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KIRVOTA

0:vot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:von   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;
